Washington statutes.
RCW 3.74.020

Full time district judges ineligible for any other office or public employment than judicial.

The full time judges of the district court shall be ineligible to any other office, or public employment than a judicial office or employment during the term for which they shall have been elected.

[ 1984 c 258 s 55; 1961 c 299 s 131.]

NOTES:

Court Improvement Act of 1984—Effective dates—Severability—Short title—1984 c 258: See notes following RCW 3.30.010.